apertium-olr.olr.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АаБбВвГгДдЖжЗзИиІіЇїЙйКкЛлМмНнОоПпРрСсТтУуФфХхЦцЧчШшЩщЪъЫыЬьЭэѠѡѢѣѤѥѦѧѨѩѪѫѬѭѮѯѰѱѲѳѴѵѶѷѸѹѼѽѾѿꙀꙁꙂꙃ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="noun"/>
    <sdef n="verb"/>
    <sdef n="adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="du"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- PARDEFS: Nouns -->  
    <pardef n="n_*a-склон_f">
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ою</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ама</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ама</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>амъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ахъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*ja-склон_f">
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*ja-склон_f">
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*o-склон_m">
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ома</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ома</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>омъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*o-склон_n">
      <e><p><l>о</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>о</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ома</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ома</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>омъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*jo-склон_m">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ема</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ема</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>емъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ихъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="кум"><p><l>кум</l><r>кум</r></p><par n="n_*o-склон_m"/></e>
	<e lm="аблъко"><p><l>аблък</l><r>аблъко</r></p><par n="n_*o-склон_n"/></e>
	<e lm="аблоко"><p><l>аблок</l><r>аблоко</r></p><par n="n_*o-склон_n"/></e>
